South Dakota, session 2026, HB1018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That 2022 Session Laws, chapter 240, § 4 be AMENDED:
Section 4. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated
by June 30, 2028, shall revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-
8.
Section 2. This Act is effective beginning June 29, 2026.

26.527.18 2 1018
An Act to amend the reversion date for moneys appropriated to the Department of Education
to improve and renovate the Cultural Heritage Center.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1018
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1018 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1018 ENROLLED